src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronouns

Personal ;

LEXICON Personal

ni+Pron+Pers+Abs:ni # ;
ni+Pron+Pers+Erg:nik # ;
ni+Pron+Pers+Dat:niri # ;
ni+Pron+Pers+Gen:nire # ;
zu+Pron+Pers+Abs:zu # ;
zu+Pron+Pers+Erg:zuk # ;
zu+Pron+Pers+Dat:zuri # ;
zu+Pron+Pers+Gen:zure # ;
hura+Pron+Pers+Abs:hura # ;
hura+Pron+Pers+Erg:harkar # ;
hura+Pron+Pers+Dat:hari # ;
hura+Pron+Pers+Gen:haren # ;
gu+Pron+Pers+Abs:gu # ;
gu+Pron+Pers+Erg:guk # ;
gu+Pron+Pers+Dat:guri # ;
gu+Pron+Pers+Gen:gure # ;
zuek+Pron+Pers+Abs:zuek # ;
zuek+Pron+Pers+Erg:zuek # ;
zuek+Pron+Pers+Dat:zuei # ;
zuek+Pron+Pers+Gen:zuen # ;
haiek+Pron+Pers+Abs:haiek # ;
haiek+Pron+Pers+Erg:haiek # ;
haiek+Pron+Pers+Dat:haiei # ;
haiek+Pron+Pers+Gen:haien # ;

ni+Pron+Pers: pronloc ;
zu+Pron+Pers: pronloc ;
hura+Pron+Pers: pronloc ;
gu+Pron+Pers: pronloc ;
zuek+Pron+Pers: pronloc ;
haiek+Pron+Pers: pronloc ;

LEXICON pronloc
+Ben:tzat # ;
+Com:kin # ;
+Ins:taz # ;
